Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1884YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.449, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Rules adopted under this section concerning driver age 3 qualifications do not apply to drivers for private and for-hire 4 motor carriers which operate solely intrastate except when the 5 vehicle being driven is transporting a hazardous material in a 6 quantity which requires placarding . The minimum age for the 7 exempted intrastate operations is eighteen years of age. 8 Sec. 2. Section 321.450, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 3. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section , or the 11 age requirements under section 321.449 , the age requirements 12 under section 321.449 and the rules adopted under this section 13 pertaining to compliance with regulations adopted under 14 United States Code, Tit. 49, and found in 49 C.F.R. Â§177.804 , 15 shall not apply to retail dealers of fertilizers, petroleum 16 products, and pesticides and their employees while delivering 17 fertilizers, petroleum products, and pesticides to farm 18 customers within a one-hundred-mile radius of their retail 19 place of business. 20